Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202625-21,279
Action to seek injunction; authorized.

Any victim as defined in section 81-1848 may pursue a civil action to seek an injunction to enforce the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act and sections 81-1843 to 81-1851.

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1181, § 2.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, see section 81-1841.